Connecticut, session 2026, HB05064.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the general statutes be amended to establish a tax credit of five
thousand dollars, adjusted annually in accordance with any change in
the consumer price index, for food donated by farmers to charitable
organizations.